Illinois, session 104th, HB1653.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 5103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 6Section 115 of Article 48 as follows: 7    (P.A. 103-0589, Art. 48, Sec. 115)8    Sec. 115.The sum of $8,500,000 $4,500,000, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department 10of Agriculture from the Partners for Conservation Fund for 11grants to Soil and Water Conservation Districts for ordinary 12and contingent administrative expenses. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.